Louisiana, session 2026, HB78.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 4843(G) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 4843. City court jurisdiction; amount in dispute; injunctive actions by state or
political subdivision
* * *
G. In the City Court of Alexandria, the City Court of East St. Tammany, the
City Court of Bogalusa, the City Court of Hammond, the City Court of Lake Charles,
the City Court of Pineville, the City Court of Ruston, the City Court of Sulphur, and
the Third Ward City Court of Franklin, the civil jurisdiction is concurrent with the
district court in cases where the amount in dispute, or the value of the property
involved, does not exceed fifty thousand dollars.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.